Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2456.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.17 . Payments for Extraordinary Personal Care Services.-- The department shall seek a waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to permit payment for extraordinary personal care services provided by a legally responsible relative to a Medical Assistance recipient when the personal care service is a covered service. The department shall implement this section subject to Federal approval.123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2456PN3270 - 2 - 1